Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-6] Procedure for recognition of
foreign-country judgment. (a) If recognition of a foreign-country
judgment is sought as an original matter, the issue of recognition shall be
raised by filing an action seeking recognition of the foreign-country judgment.

(b) If recognition of a foreign-country
judgment is sought in a pending action, the issue of recognition may be raised
by counterclaim, cross-claim, or affirmative defense. [L 2009, c 34, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next